Utah statutes.
17-43-307.   Authority to receive funds.

A local mental health authority and an entity that contracts with a local mental health authority to provide mental health services, may receive funds made available by federal, state, or local health, mental health, education, welfare, or other agencies.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 22, 2003 General Session

